Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1363
Preservation of historical, archaeological, and paleontological remains; agreements; funds; payment.

To more effectually preserve the historical, archaeological, and paleontological remains of the state, the department is authorized to enter into agreements with the appropriate agencies of the state charged with preserving historical, archaeological, and paleontological remains to have these agencies remove and preserve such remains disturbed or to be disturbed by highway construction and to use highway funds, when appropriated, for this purpose. This authority specifically extends to highways which are part of the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways as defined in the Federal Aid Highway Act of 1956, Public Law 627, 84th Congress, and the use of state funds on a matching basis with federal funds therein.

Laws 1959, c. 178, § 1, p. 649;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 133.